Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-819
Schools; contract of employment; contents.

A contract for employment of a teacher or administrator authorized under section 79-818 shall contain (1) a provision by which the employed person affirms that he or she holds or will hold, at the beginning of the term of the contract, a valid certificate properly registered with the school district and that he or she is not under contract with another school board of a school district in this state and (2) a provision that there shall be no penalty for release from the contract.

Laws 1943, c. 201, § 2, p. 672;

R.S.1943, § 79-2147;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 350, p. 808;

Laws 1971, LB 802, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1250;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 449;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 89.

Certificate, registration, see section 79-804.

Teacher must hold at beginning of term valid certificate registered in office of county superintendent. Johnson v. School Dist. No. 3 of Clay County, 168 Neb. 547, 96 N.W.2d 623 (1959).